Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-204 Construction. This part
shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose under section 431:16-202
which shall constitute an aid and guide to interpretation. [L 1987, c 347, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next